Washington statutes.
RCW 11.02.120

Transfer of shares—Liability.

Neither a domestic or foreign corporation or its registrar or transfer agent shall be liable for transferring or causing to be transferred on the books of the corporation to or pursuant to the direction of the surviving spouse or the surviving domestic partner any share or shares or other securities theretofore issued by the corporation to the deceased or surviving spouse or both, or to the deceased or surviving domestic partner or both, if the corporation or its registrar or transfer agent shall be provided with the following:

(1) A copy of an agreement which shall have been entered into between the spouses or between the domestic partners pursuant to RCW 26.16.120 and certified by the auditor of the county in this state in whose office the same shall have been recorded;

(2) A certified copy of the death certificate of the deceased spouse or deceased domestic partner;

(3) An affidavit of the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner that:

(a) The shares or other securities constituted community property of the spouses or the domestic partners at date of death of the deceased spouse or deceased domestic partner and their disposition is controlled by the community property agreement;

(b) No proceedings have been instituted to contest or set aside or cancel the agreement; and that

(c) The claims of creditors have been paid or provided for.

[ 2008 c 6 s 904; 1990 c 180 s 9.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.